Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1249
Sale of consumer fireworks; limitations.

It shall be unlawful to sell any consumer fireworks
at retail within this state, outside the limits of any incorporated city or
village. Consumer fireworks may be
sold at retail only between June 24 and July 5 and between December 28 and January 1 of each
year.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 281;

Laws 1999, LB 621, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 1091, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB880, § 8.